Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Issuance of Shares

§ 17-16-620.
Subscription for shares before incorporation.

A subscription for shares entered into before incorporation is irrevocable for six (6) months unless the subscription agreement provides a longer or shorter period or all the subscribers agree to revocation.

The board of directors may determine the payment terms of subscriptions for shares that were entered into before incorporation, unless the subscription agreement specifies them. A call for payment by the board of directors shall be uniform so far as practicable as to all shares of the same class or series, unless the subscription agreement specifies otherwise.

Shares issued pursuant to subscriptions entered into before incorporation are fully paid and nonassessable when the corporation receives the consideration specified in the subscription agreement.

If a subscriber defaults in payment of money or property under a subscription agreement entered into before incorporation, the corporation may collect the amount owed as any other debt. Alternatively, unless the subscription agreement provides otherwise, the corporation may rescind the agreement and may sell the shares if the debt remains unpaid more than twenty (20) days after the corporation sends written demand for payment to the subscriber.

A subscription agreement entered into after incorporation is a contract between the subscriber and the corporation subject to W.S.

17-16-621

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enforcement of stock subscription after suit on note of subscriber is barred by statute, 11 ALR2d 1380.

Conversion by promoter of money paid for a preincorporation subscription for stock shares as embezzlement, 84 ALR2d 1100.

§ 17-16-621.
Issuance of shares.

The powers granted in this section to the board of directors may be reserved to the shareholders by the articles of incorporation.

The board of directors may authorize shares to be issued for consideration consisting of any tangible or intangible property or benefit to the corporation, including cash, promissory notes, services performed, contracts for services to be performed, or other securities of the corporation.

Before the corporation issues shares, the board of directors shall determine that the consideration received or to be received for shares to be issued is adequate. That determination by the board of directors is conclusive insofar as the adequacy of consideration for the issuance of shares relates to whether the shares are validly issued, fully paid, and nonassessable.

When the corporation receives the consideration for which the board of directors authorized the issuance of shares, the shares issued therefor are fully paid and nonassessable.

The corporation may place in escrow shares issued for a contract for future services or benefits or a promissory note, or make other arrangements to restrict the transfer of the shares, and may credit distributions in respect of the shares against their purchase price, until the services are performed, the note is paid, or the benefits received. If the services are not performed, the note is not paid, or the benefits are not received, the shares escrowed or restricted and the distributions credited may be cancelled in whole or part.

An issuance of shares or other securities convertible into or rights exercisable for shares, in a transaction or a series of integrated transactions, requires approval of the shareholders, at a meeting at which a quorum exists, if:
(f) (i) An issuance of shares or other securities convertible into or rights exercisable for shares, in a transaction or a series of integrated transactions, requires approval of the shareholders, at a meeting at which a quorum exists, if:

The shares, other securities, or rights are issued for consideration other than cash or cash equivalents; and

The voting power of shares that are issued and issuable as a result of the transaction or series of integrated transactions will comprise more than twenty percent (20%) of the voting power of the shares of the corporation that were outstanding immediately before the transaction.

The voting power of the shares to be issued; or

The voting power of the shares that would be outstanding after giving effect to the conversion of convertible shares and other securities and the exercise of rights to be issued.

(B)

A series of transactions is integrated if consummation of one (1) transaction is made contingent on consummation of one (1) or more of the other transactions.

(ii)

In this subsection:

(A)

For purposes of determining the voting power of shares issued and issuable as a result of a transaction or series of integrated transactions, the voting power of shares shall be the greater of:

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (f).

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Cited

in

Ravenswood Inv. Co., L.P. v. Bishop Capital Corp., 374 F. Supp. 2d 1055, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12932 (2005).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Capital Margin Concept and the Wyoming Corporate Law,” see VII Wyo. L.J. 117 (1953).

For note, “Issuance of Par Value Stock for Services Under the Wyoming Corporation Law,” see XI Wyo. L.J. 36 (1957).

For comment, “An Innovative Approach to Piercing the Corporate Veil: An Introduction to the Individual Factor and Cumulative Effects Analysis,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 563 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Patent rights, copyrights, trademarks, secret processes, formulas or the like, as “property” within provisions of law or charter forbidding issuance of corporate stock, except for money paid or property received, 37 ALR2d 913.

Construction and effect of statutory provisions precluding issuance of corporate stock in consideration of promissory notes, 78 ALR2d 834.

Sufficiency of consideration for employee stock option contract, 57 ALR3d 1241.

§ 17-16-622.
Liability of shareholders.

A purchaser from a corporation of its own shares is not liable to the corporation or its creditors with respect to the shares except to pay the consideration for which the shares were authorized to be issued pursuant to W.S.

17-16-621

or specified in the subscription agreement pursuant to W.S.

17-16-620

.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a shareholder of a corporation is not personally liable for the acts or debts of the corporation except that he may become personally liable by reason of his own acts or conduct.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

For discussion as to when corporate veil may be pierced,

see Amfac Mechanical Supply Co. v. Federer, 645 P.2d 73,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1982).

Liability. —

When a corporation was liable to an investor for conversion, and no grounds existed for piercing the corporate veil, business owners, with whom the investor had created a business, had no individual liability.
Lieberman v. Mossbrook, 2009 WY 65, 208 P.3d 1296,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2009).

Quoted

in

Kaycee Land & Livestock v. Flahive, 2002 WY 73, 46 P.3d 323,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Piercing the Corporate Veil in Wyoming - An Update,” see 3 Wyo. L. Rev. 133 (2003).

§ 17-16-623.
Share dividends.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, shares may be issued pro rata and without consideration to the corporation’s shareholders or to the shareholders of one (1) or more classes or series. An issuance of shares under this subsection is a share dividend.

Shares of one (1) class or series may not be issued as a share dividend in respect of shares of another class or series unless:

The articles of incorporation so authorize;

A majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the class or series to be issued approve the issue; or

There are no outstanding shares of the class or series to be issued.

If the board of directors does not fix the record date for determining shareholders entitled to a share dividend, it is the date the board of directors authorizes the share dividend.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Declaration of dividends rests in directors' discretion. —

Mere fact that corporation has large amount of surplus or net profits does not entitle stockholders to payment of dividends, and unless some restraint is imposed by statute, charter, bylaws, contract or otherwise, whether dividends shall be declared rests in the sound discretion of the directors. Morrison v. State Bank, 58 Wyo. 138, 126 P.2d 793,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1942).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Concept of Surplus as Applicable to Dividends,” see II Wyo. L.J. 114 (1948).

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Cancellation of accrued preferred stock dividends, 8 ALR2d 893.

Overpayment of dividends on preferred stock as deductible in payments of dividends for later years, 10 ALR2d 241.

Parties defendant to stockholder's suit to compel declaration of dividend, 15 ALR2d 1124.

Rights of preferred stockholders to dividends, upon liquidation or dissolution, 25 ALR2d 788.

Rights of preferred stockholders as to passed or accumulated dividends in going concern, 27 ALR2d 1073.

Dividend rights in surplus of new consolidated corporation resulting from reduction of capital stock of former constituent corporations, 28 ALR2d 1177.

Right, as between life beneficiaries and remaindermen or successive life beneficiaries, in corporate dividends, 44 ALR2d 1277.

Corporation's right to interplead claimants to dividends, 46 ALR2d 980.

§ 17-16-624.
Share options.

A corporation may issue rights, options, or warrants for the purchase of shares of the corporation. The board of directors shall determine the terms upon which the rights, options, or warrants are issued and the terms, including the consideration for which the shares are to be issued. The authorization by the board of directors for the corporation to issue the rights, options or warrants constitutes authorization of the issuance of the shares or other securities for which the rights, options or warrants are exercisable.

The terms and conditions of such rights, options or warrants, including those outstanding on July 1, 2009, may include, without limitation, restrictions or conditions that:

Preclude or limit the exercise, transfer or receipt of such rights, options or warrants by any person owning or offering to acquire a specified number or percentage of the outstanding shares or other securities of the corporation or by any transferee of any such person; or

Invalidate or void the rights, options or warrants held by any such person or transferee.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), substituted “and the terms, including the” for “their form and content, and the” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence; and added (b).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of stock option plan under which the elected personnel of corporation may acquire stock interest therein, 34 ALR2d 852.

Rights and liabilities as between employer and employee with respect to employee stock options, 96 ALR2d 176.

Valuation of corporate stock under “buy out” or “first option” agreement giving option to or requiring corporation or other stockholders to purchase stock of deceased or withdrawing stockholders, 54 ALR3d 790.

Waiver of stockholder's right to enforce first option stock purchase agreement, 55 ALR3d 723.

Who is “employee” under stock option plan or contract, 57 ALR3d 787.

Construction and effect of “dilution” provision of employee's stock option contract dealing with rights where stock structure changes before option is exercised, 59 ALR3d 1030.

Divorce and separation: treatment of stock options for purposes of dividing marital property, 46 ALR4th 640.

Valuation of stock options for purposes of divorce court's property distribution, 46 ALR4th 689.

§ 17-16-625.
Form and content of certificates.

Shares may but need not be represented by certificates. Unless this act or another statute expressly provides otherwise, the rights and obligations of shareholders are identical whether or not their shares are represented by certificates.

At a minimum each share certificate shall state on its face:

The name of the issuing corporation and that it is organized under the law of this state;

The name of the person to whom, or in the case of a certificate token, the data address to which the token was issued; and

The number and class of shares and the designation of the series, if any, the certificate represents.

If the issuing corporation is authorized to issue different classes of shares or different series within a class, the designations, relative rights, preferences, and limitations applicable to each class and the variations in rights, preferences, and limitations determined for each series, and the authority of the board of directors to determine variations for future series, shall be summarized on the front or back of each certificate. Alternatively, each certificate may state conspicuously on its front or back that the corporation will furnish the shareholder this information on request in writing and without charge.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (g) of this section, each share certificate:

Shall be signed, either manually or in facsimile, by two (2) officers designated in the bylaws or by the board of directors; and

May bear the corporate seal or its facsimile.

If the person who signed a share certificate no longer holds office when the certificate is issued, the certificate is nevertheless valid.

In no case shall a corporation issue share certificates in bearer form. For purposes of this subsection “bearer form” means a form in which the certificate is payable to the bearer of the certificate according to its terms but not by reason of an endorsement. If a corporation formed under this act or qualified to do business under this act has bearer shares outstanding, the entity shall conform those shares to comply with this section on or before October 1, 2007. Failure to do so shall be prima facie evidence of an ultra vires act pursuant to W.S.

17-16-304

.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws of a corporation may specify that all or a portion of the shares of the corporation may be represented by share certificates in the form of certificate tokens. The electronic message, command or transaction that transmits the certificate tokens to the data address to which a certificate token was issued shall be authorized at the time of issuance by one (1) or more messages, commands or transactions signed with the network signatures of two (2) officers designated in the bylaws or by the board of directors of the corporation.

As used in this section:

“Blockchain” means a digital ledger or database which is chronological, consensus based, decentralized and mathematically verified in nature;

“Certificate token” means a representation of shares that is stored in an electronic format which contains the information specified under subsections (b) and (c) of this section, and this information is:

Entered into a blockchain or other secure, auditable database;

Linked to or associated with the certificate token; and

Able to be transmitted electronically to the issuing corporation, the person to whom the certificate token was issued and any transferee.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2007, ch. 19, § 1; 2019 ch. 93, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to sale of securities to general public, see chapter 4 of this title.

As to investment securities, see § 34.1-8-101 et seq.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (f).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(ii), added “or in the case of a certificate token, the data address to which the token was”; in the introductory language in (d), added “Except as otherwise provided by subsection (g) of this section”; in (e), deleted “either manually or in facsimile”; and added (g) and (h).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Corporation's delivery of stock certificate to stockholder as prerequisite of its issuance to him, 16 ALR3d 1015.

Construction and effect of UCC art. 8, dealing with investment securities, 21 ALR3d 964; 88 ALR3d 949.

Measure of damages for conversion of stock certificate, 31 ALR3d 1286.

Issuance of stock certificate to joint tenants as creating gift inter vivos, 5 ALR4th 373.

§ 17-16-626.
Shares without certificates.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may authorize the issue of some or all of the shares of any or all of its classes or series without certificates. The authorization does not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are surrendered to the corporation.

Within a reasonable time after the issue or transfer of shares without certificates, the corporation shall give the shareholder a written statement of the information required on certificates by W.S. 17-16-625(b) and (c), and, if applicable, W.S.

17-16-627

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2; 2018 ch. 47, § 1, effective March 10, 2018.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “its classes or series” for “the classes or series” in the first sentence of (a).

The 2018 amendment,

in (b), substituted “corporation shall give the” for “corporation shall send the.

Laws 2018, ch. 47, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2018.

§ 17-16-627.
Restriction on transfer of shares and other securities.

The articles of incorporation, bylaws, an agreement among shareholders, or an agreement between shareholders and the corporation may impose restrictions on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares of the corporation. A restriction does not affect shares issued before the restriction was adopted unless the holders of the shares are parties to the restriction agreement or voted in favor of the restriction.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares is valid and enforceable against the holder or a transferee of the holder if the restriction is authorized by this section and its existence is noted conspicuously on the front or back of the certificate or is contained in the information statement required by W.S. 17-16-626(b). Unless so noted or contained, a restriction is not enforceable against a person without knowledge of the restriction.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares is authorized:

To maintain the corporation’s status when it is dependent on the number or identity of its shareholders;

To preserve exemptions under federal or state securities law; or

For any other reasonable purpose.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares may:

Obligate the shareholder first to offer the corporation or other persons, separately, consecutively, or simultaneously, an opportunity to acquire the restricted shares;

Obligate the corporation or other persons, separately, consecutively, or simultaneously, to acquire the restricted shares;

Require the corporation, the holders of any class of its shares, or another person to approve the transfer of the restricted shares, if the requirement is not manifestly unreasonable; or

Prohibit the transfer of the restricted shares to designated persons or classes of persons, if the prohibition is not manifestly unreasonable.

For purposes of this section, “shares” includes a security convertible into or carrying a right to subscribe for or acquire shares.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “or contained” in the last sentence of (b).

Shareholder approval of transfer restrictions. —

The purpose of the subsection (a) requirement that shareholders either participate in a shareholders' agreement approving the restriction or vote in favor of the restriction is to protect shareholders from having their shares of stock devalued by transfer restrictions that are adopted without their consent after their shares were issued. Croonberg v. Estate of Croonberg, 988 P.2d 41,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1999).

Where all three shareholder/directors in a closely-held corporation voted in favor of a bylaw amendment imposing share transfer restrictions, the shareholders consented to having the transfer restrictions apply to all the corporation's shares, including those issued before the bylaw amendment. Croonberg v. Estate of Croonberg, 988 P.2d 41,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The New Wyoming Statutory Close Corporation Supplement; Should Your Corporation Elect Statutory Close Corporation Status?,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 589 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of provision restricting sale or transfer of corporate stock, 2 ALR2d 745.

Validity of restrictions on alienation and transfer of corporate stock, 61 ALR2d 1318.

Restrictions on transfer of corporate stock as applicable to testamentary dispositions, 61 ALR3d 1090.

Validity of “consent restraint” on transfer of shares of close corporation, 69 ALR3d 1327.

§ 17-16-628.
Expense of issue.

A corporation may pay the expenses of selling or underwriting its shares, and of organizing or reorganizing the corporation, from the consideration received for shares.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.